West Virginia, session 2026, HJR22.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia:ARTICLE X. TAXATION AND FINANCE.§1d. Legislative Authority to Repeal Business and Inventory Ad Valorem Taxation on Tangible Personal Property.Notwithstanding any other provision of this Constitution, the Legislature may, by general law, do one or more of the following:(1) Exempt one or more species of tangible personal property from ad valorem property taxation;(2) Reduce the rate of taxation or assessment for one or more species of tangible personal property;(3) Establish different statewide rates of taxation, statewide rates of assessment, and statewide methods of valuation for different species of tangible personal property: Provided, That uniformity in taxation is not required among the different species of tangible personal property: Provided, however, That neither the Legislature nor a levying body may establish a rate of taxation or assessment for any species of tangible personal property that exceeds the applicable limitations contained in this article, except as expressly authorized by the other sections of this article; and(4) Classify property as real property or as personal property for the purposes of ad valorem property taxation.Resolved further, That in accordance with the provisions of article 11, chapter three of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, such amendment is hereby numbered "Amendment No. 1" and designated as the "Motor Vehicle and Other Personal Property Tax Reduction Amendment" and the purpose of the proposed amendment is summarized as follows: "The purpose of this amendment is to permit the Legislature to eliminate or lower the ad valorem personal property tax on motor vehicles and all other species of tangible personal property; to permit the Legislature to establish different statewide rates of taxation, rates of assessment, and methods of valuation for different species of tangible personal property; and to permit the Legislature to classify property as real property or personal property for ad valorem taxation."NOTE: The purpose of this resolution is to permit the Legislature to exempt some species of tangible personal property from ad valorem taxation, reduce the rate of taxation or assessment for any species of tangible personal property; establish different statewide rates of taxation, assessment, or methods of valuation for different species of tangible personal property, or classify property as real property or personal property for ad valorem taxation.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home